Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1812
Real property taxes; sale book; entries.

The county treasurer shall keep a sale book showing in separate columns the number and date of each certificate of sale, the name of the owners or owner if known, the description of the real property, the name of the purchaser, the total amount of taxes and costs for which sold, the amount of subsequent taxes paid by the purchaser and date of payment, to whom assigned, and the amount paid therefor, name of person redeeming, date of redemption, total amount paid for redemption, name of person to whom conveyed, and date of deed.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 204, p. 463;

R.S.1913, § 6532;

C.S.1922, § 6060;

C.S.1929, § 77-2012;

R.S.1943, § 77-1812;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 146;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 119.